Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 40 Veterans

40.005.
Authorization to enact veterans’ bonus.

The General Assembly shall by law provide for the issuance and sale of bonds of the Commonwealth, notwithstanding the limitation of indebtedness in Section 49 or any other section of the Constitution of Kentucky, which shall be in addition to all other bonds of the Commonwealth heretofore authorized. The proceeds of such additional bonds, or so many thereof as may be necessary for the purpose, shall be used and appropriated solely for the purpose of paying a cash bonus not to exceed $500 for service outside the continental limits of the United States, and $300 for service in the continental limits of the United States to the veterans, their widows or heirs, or next of kin, of the Spanish-American War, World War I, World War II, and the Korean conflict, who were residents of the Commonwealth at the time of their entry into the service and at least six (6) months prior thereto. The General Assembly at the same session authorizing the issuance of the bonds shall levy a tax upon all retail sales at such a rate as will pay the interest upon and retire the bonds in no less than thirty (30) years, provided that retail sales of food and food products, medicines, and clothing may be exempted from such tax.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 48, § 1.

40.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following respective meanings, unless another meaning is clearly required by the context:

“Administrator” means the adjutant general of the Commonwealth;

“Veteran” means a person who served in the active Armed Forces of the United States, during the Spanish American War, World War I, World War II, or the Korean conflict, for a period of ninety (90) days or more (exclusive of time spent AWOL; or in penal confinement as a result of a sentence imposed by court-martial; or in service for which no allowance is made according to KRS

40.040

), with some portion of service within the respective hereinafter prescribed dates, who is still in the Armed Forces, or was released, separated, discharged, or retired therefrom under honorable conditions;

“Duty in active Armed Forces” includes active duty, and any period of inactive duty training during which the individual concerned was disabled; and if a person in the active Armed Forces was released, separated, or discharged therefrom by reason of disability incurred in line of duty before serving as much as ninety (90) days, such person shall be qualified for entitlement to a bonus payment under this chapter, notwithstanding failure to remain in service for the minimum time otherwise prescribed;

“Armed Forces” means the United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, and Coast Guard, including the reserve components thereof on active duty;

“Qualified veteran” means a person answering to the specifications set forth in subsections (2) and (3), and who

Was a resident of the Commonwealth at the time of entry into active service in the Armed Forces and for at least six (6) months prior thereto; and

Who has not received a bonus or like compensation from another state; and

Who is not subject to the forfeiture provisions of this chapter;

“Resident of the Commonwealth at the time of entry into the active service” means any person who gave the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any specific place in this Commonwealth, as his or her place of residence at such time of entry, without regard to the place of enlistment, commission, or induction. Conclusive and exclusive evidence of such giving of place of residence shall be the official records on file in the Department of Defense of the United States, or any official record thereof in the files of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; but if it be shown to the satisfaction of the administrator that for any reason no such record was made, or that the same has been lost, misplaced, or destroyed, or that an authenticated copy thereof cannot be obtained within a reasonable time, other evidence of bona fide residence may be accepted if deemed sufficient by the administrator;

“Resident,” in any context other than as in subsection (6), means a legal resident as determined by generally established principles of law, as may be defined, and subject to proof, according to such regulations as the administrator may promulgate;

“Beneficiary” means, in this order, widow, child or children (sharing equally), mother, father, and no other;

“Widow” means a woman who was the wife of a veteran at the time of his death, and who had not deserted him (except where there was a separation which was due to the misconduct of, or procured by, the veteran without the fault of the wife), and who had not remarried, (unless the purported remarriage was void or had been annulled);

The term “widow” also includes “widower” in the case of a man who was the husband of a female veteran at the time of her death;

“Child” means a person:

Who is under the age of eighteen (18); or

Who, before attaining the age of eighteen (18) years, became permanently incapable of self-support; or

Who, after attaining the age of eighteen (18) years and until completion of education or training (but not after attaining the age of twenty-one (21) years) is pursuing a course of instruction at a bona fide educational institution; and who, in relationship to the veteran, is a child born in lawful wedlock; a legally adopted child; a stepchild who is a member of a veteran’s household or was a member at the time of the veteran’s death; or a child born out of wedlock, but, as to the alleged father, only if acknowledged in writing signed by him, or if he had, before his death, been judicially decreed to be the father of such child;

“Mother” means a mother, a mother through adoption, or a woman who for a period of not less than one (1) year stood in the relationship of a mother to a qualified veteran before his or her entry into active service in the Armed Forces, or if two (2) persons stood in such relationship for one (1) year or more, the person who last stood in such relationship before the veteran’s last entry into active service in the Armed Forces;

“Father” means a father, a father through adoption, or a man who for a period of not less than one (1) year stood in the relationship of a father to a qualified veteran before his or her entry into active service in the Armed Forces, or if two (2) persons stood in such relationship for one (1) year or more, the person who last stood in such relationship before the veteran’s last entry into active service in the Armed Forces;

“In the continental United States” means any place in the District of Columbia and the states of the United States which are on the North American continent, exclusive of Alaska;

“Outside the continental United States” means any place elsewhere than as defined in subsection (13);

“Spanish-American War”:

Means the period beginning on April 21, 1898, and ending on July 4, 1902;

Includes the Philippine Insurrection and the Boxer Rebellion; and

In the case of a veteran who served with the United States military forces engaged in hostilities in the Moro Province, means the period beginning on April 21, 1898, and ending on July 15, 1903;

“World War I”:

Means the period beginning on April 6, 1917, and ending on November 11, 1918; and

In the case of a veteran who served with the United States military forces in Russia, means the period beginning on April 6, 1917, and ending on April 1, 1920; and

Any service between April 6, 1917, and July 1, 1921, if some part thereof was between April 6, 1917, and November 11, 1918, both dates being inclusive;

“World War II” means the period beginning December 7, 1941, and ending December 31, 1946;

“Korean conflict” means the period beginning on June 27, 1950, and ending January 31, 1955;

“Bonus” and “veterans” bonus” means the compensation authorized by this chapter;

“Bonus claim” means a claim or potential claim for a veterans’ bonus;

“Claimant” means one who seeks to obtain payment of a bonus claim.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 3; 1960 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1, effective September 30, 1960; 1984, ch. 16, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2015 ch. 68, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 42, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

40.020.
Legislative intent.

This chapter is intended to implement KRS

40.005

, ratified by the electorate at the regular elections on November 3, 1959, by providing for payment of a cash bonus to qualified veterans, or to certain persons deriving from them, as quickly and as free from administrative delay and expense as may be consistent with provident stewardship of public moneys of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 1, effective February 20, 1960.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Regulations regarding the veterans’ bonus that the application may be signed by a minor who is married or in the armed forces if he has no guardian or committee and that the check may be paid directly to such minor are not contrary to or prohibited by law.

OAG 61-998

.

It was the intention of the legislature that all beneficiaries entitled to a bonus should receive their share thereof, but that where the veterans’ division makes a determination as to the validity of a claim, though later found to be erroneous, and makes a conscientious though unsuccessful effort to recover an erroneous overpayment of a bonus, no additional funds can be paid out to other qualified beneficiaries.

OAG 62-997

.

40.030.
Direction that bonus be paid.

A bonus shall be paid from the proceeds of bonds of the Commonwealth, issued as hereinafter provided, in the amounts and to the persons determined in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 2, effective February 20, 1960.

Opinions of Attorney General.

It was the intention of the legislature that all beneficiaries entitled to a bonus should receive their share thereof, but that where the veterans’ division makes a determination as to the validity of a claim, though later found to be erroneous, and makes a conscientious though unsuccessful effort to recover an erroneous overpayment of a bonus, no additional funds can be paid out to other qualified beneficiaries.

OAG 62-997

.

40.040.
Service for which no allowance shall be made.

No compensation shall be paid for time in service, of:

Any civilian officer or employee of any branch of the Armed Forces, contract surgeon, cadet of the United States Military Academy, midshipman of the United States Naval Academy or of the Coast Guard, member of the Reserve Officers Training Corps, member of the Students’ Army Training Corps (except an enlisted man detailed to a training detachment of any of the foregoing), Philippine Scout, member of the Philippine Guard, member of the Philippine Constabulary, member of the Puerto Rico Regiment of Infantry, member of the National Guard of Hawaii, member of the Insular Forces of the Navy, member of the Samoan Native Guard, and Band of the Navy, or Indian Scout, in each case, for the period of service as such;

Any member of the Public Health Service, for any period during which he or she was not detailed for active duty with the Armed Forces;

Any person granted a farm or industrial furlough, for the period of such furlough;

Any person detailed for work in the Spruce Production Division of the Air Service, for the period during which his pay was equalized to conform to the pay of civilian employees in the same or like employment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 4, effective February 20, 1960.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

War legislation in nature of moratory statute, members of militia as entitled to benefit of. 137 A.L.R. 1400; 147 A.L.R. 1311.

40.050.
Computation of bonus.

Every person determined by the administrator to be a qualified veteran shall be paid the sum of nine dollars ($9) for each month and major fraction of a month of active duty, in the Armed Forces in the continental United States, not to exceed in all the sum of three hundred dollars ($300), and the sum of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for each month and major fraction of a month of such service outside the continental United States, subject to an aggregate limit for all service in the sum of five hundred dollars ($500). A veteran who served in one or more of the conflict periods defined in subsections (15), (16), (17), and (18) of KRS

40.010

shall be limited to a maximum payment of three hundred dollars ($300) if no part of his total service during the periods specified was served outside the continental United States, or five hundred dollars ($500) if a part of his total service during the periods specified was served outside the continental United States.

If a person determined to have been a qualified veteran shall be deceased at the time payment of the veterans’ bonus would otherwise be made to him, the amount of his bonus shall be paid to the first surviving beneficiary, if any, according to the order of priority defined in subsection (8) of KRS

40.010

and if there be no surviving beneficiary, the bonus of such veteran shall lapse, and no payment thereof shall be made.

A beneficiary (as defined in subsections (8), (9), (10), (11), and (12) of KRS

40.010

) of a person killed in the line of duty while on active duty in the Armed Forces during the periods defined in subsections (15), (16), (17), and (18) of KRS

40.010

or person who died of service-connected injury sustained while on active duty in the Armed Forces during the conflict periods defined above shall be paid three hundred dollars ($300) if no part of his total service during these periods was served outside the continental United States or five hundred dollars ($500) if any part of his total service during these periods was served outside the continental United States. The provisions of subsection (1) and the minimum period of service for entitlement to a bonus as established by subsection (2) of KRS 40.010 shall not apply to these beneficiaries. However, this exception does not waive the respective maximums of three hundred dollars ($300) or five hundred dollars ($500) for each veteran, person killed in the line of duty while on active duty in the Armed Forces, or person who died as a result of service-connected injury sustained while on active duty in the Armed Forces.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 5, effective February 20, 1960.

40.060.
Applications.

All applications for the veterans’ bonus shall be submitted to the administrator, in writing, upon forms prepared and made available by the administrator; and shall be accompanied by such documentary evidence as the administrator may by regulation prescribe. Every application shall be verified under oath, and shall contain representations of the claimant (or, if he shall have been adjudged mentally disabled, or be an infant, his guardian or conservator), that:

The facts therein stated are true to the best of his or her knowledge and belief;

All documents submitted in support of the application are believed by the claimant to be genuine originals, or copies, as the case may be; and the claimant has no knowledge that any fact appearing therein is false, or no longer true, or that the document has been superseded or canceled;

The claimant has not received a veterans’ bonus or like compensation from any other state;

That the claimant has neither paid nor agreed to pay, directly or indirectly, any compensation for assistance received in preparing or tendering the application; and has not solicited, received, or agreed to receive, directly or indirectly, any compensation for rendering assistance to any other claimant; and

The claimant has knowledge of the penal and forfeiture provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 6, effective February 20, 1960; 1982, ch. 141, § 43, effective July 1, 1982.

40.070.
Time of filing applications — Extension — Return of late applications.

No application may be filed with or sent to the administrator after June 30, 1962; but if an application be sent by mail, the administrator shall receive it if the postmark on the envelope shows date and time of mailing at or before midnight, central standard time, on or before June 30, 1962.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, in order to prevent hardship on any eligible veteran, the Governor upon recommendation of the administrator may, by executive order, extend the time for filing application; provided, however, that such extension of time shall be no later than December 31, 1962.

Applications tendered to the administrator otherwise than as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not be eligible for consideration under this chapter and shall not be accepted. Each such application received by mail shall be returned to the sender, if a return address be given, together with notification of the reason for its return.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 7; 1962, ch. 191, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section governs only the time in which the original application is required to be filed and has no bearing upon the time in which a request or application by a beneficiary for payment may be made in event of a veteran’s death after filing his application and before payment is made.

OAG 61-998

.

No extension whatsoever is permitted beyond the December 31st filing deadline.

OAG 62-16

.

40.080.
Supporting documents — Discretionary hearing.

All facts material to determining whether the claimant is entitled to receive a veterans’ bonus shall be evidenced:

In any case where the same are shown in the official records of the Department of Defense, Department of Veterans Affairs, or any other department, bureau, or agency of the United States, by an authenticated copy of the record, or a certificate made by an authorized person in the department, bureau, or agency concerned, or by a written communication signed by such authorized person;

In any case where the same are shown in any public record of the Commonwealth or of any public body in the Commonwealth, by a copy of the record, or the material part thereof, attested by the clerk or comparable officer;

In any case where the same are shown in an instrument of writing, by tendering the instrument, or a photostat copy, or a copy authenticated in a manner acceptable to the administrator;

Otherwise by affidavit.

No claimant shall be entitled to an oral hearing as a matter of right; but the administrator may in his discretion order a hearing in any case presenting unusual circumstances, or where it appears that documentary evidence of any material fact cannot reasonably be obtained, or where the claim cannot otherwise adequately be determined. If a hearing is ordered, it shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. The administrator may investigate any matter which in his judgment is not adequately proven, or which shows or raises an inference of fraud, and may require submission of supplementary proof.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 8, effective February 20, 1960; 1996, ch. 318, § 25, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 42, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Archives and records, KRS

171.410

to

171.740

.

40.090.
Hearing procedure. [Repealed.]

40.100.
Burden of proof.

The burden of proving to the satisfaction of the administrator that a veterans’ bonus is entitled to be paid shall in all cases be upon the claimant.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 10, effective February 20, 1960.

40.110.
Prompt determination to be made.

The administrator shall make prompt determination that each application is approved or disapproved for payment of a veterans’ bonus and if approved shall determine the amount to be paid according to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 11, effective February 20, 1960.

40.120.
Notice of disapproval of claim to be sent to claimant — Review procedure.

If a claim is disapproved, the administrator shall send a notice of such decision to the claimant by mail at the address shown in the application. The notice shall be in such form as the administrator may determine, shall contain a designation of the reason for disapproval, shall inform the claimant of his or her right to seek review, shall have attached such form of request for review as the administrator may prescribe, and shall give information as to procedure for review.

Application for review of the administrator’s disapproval shall be made only on the forms prescribed and furnished by the administrator; and shall be received in the office of the administrator by the closing hour in the thirtieth day after the day upon which the notice of the disapproval is mailed by the administrator, or be forever barred.

Upon receiving an application for review, the administrator shall transmit the same, together with the original application and all papers in the case, to the board of review, hereinafter created.

The board of review shall promptly consider the same evidence which was available to the administrator, and shall promptly enter in the case file its decision either finally affirming the administrator’s decision, or finally determining the claim and the amount thereof.

The board of review shall send a notice of its decision to the claimant by certified mail, return receipt requested, and shall return the case file to the administrator. The decision of the board of review shall be a final determination of the claim shown in the application. There shall be no right of recourse on the part of the claimant or the administrator in any court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 12; 1974, ch. 315, § 3; 1980, ch. 114, § 6, effective July 15, 1980.

40.130.
Effect of final disapproval — Procedure.

If the administrator shall disapprove any claim, or if the decision of the board of review be affirmance of the administrator’s disapproval of the claim,

No payment of a veterans’ bonus shall be made;

The administrator, upon receiving advice of the decision, shall note the same in a permanent book or record in his office; shall forthwith return to the claimant the copies of any official records submitted in support of the application; shall finally close the claim file; and may destroy all other papers except the application;

No person having knowledge of the final disapproval of the claim thereafter shall file an application for payment of the same claim, or take action seeking in any manner to obtain payment of a veterans’ bonus thereon; and the filing of any such application, or the taking of any such action, shall constitute an offense under KRS

40.990

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 13, effective February 20, 1960.

40.140.
Setting off tax delinquency against bonus.

If a claim is approved by the administrator or finally approved upon resort to the board of review, in whole or in part the administrator shall promptly certify to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet the names and addresses of persons found entitled to be paid, as shown in the application, and the amount payable to each.

A copy of each such certificate shall be sent to the secretary of revenue, who shall promptly ascertain from the records of his cabinet whether any person proposed to be paid a veterans’ bonus is delinquent in the payment of any tax liability to the Commonwealth. No delinquency shall be deemed to exist as to any asserted tax liability which is the subject of a bona fide dispute. If any delinquency be found to exist, the secretary of revenue shall within three (3) working days after this receipt of the certificate, furnish the details thereof to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet; and if no advice of tax delinquency is received by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet before the end of the fourth working day after his receipt of certification from the administrator, he shall, for the purposes of this chapter, conclusively presume that no delinquency of tax liability to the Commonwealth exists; but such presumption shall apply only to the existence or absence of a setoff by the Commonwealth against a certified claim for a veterans’ bonus, and shall not alter the facts as between the Commonwealth and any taxpayer.

If no advice of tax delinquency is received within such allowed time, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may approve payment in accordance with the certificate of the administrator, and may immediately draw a warrant on the State Treasury for a check in payment.

Upon receipt of such warrant the State Treasurer shall issue a check in accordance therewith payable from the proceeds of bonds in accordance with this chapter, and the same shall promptly be mailed to the payee thereof at the address shown in the certificate.

If the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, within the allowed time, receive advice from the secretary of revenue of the existence of a delinquency on the part of any person having an approved claim for a veterans’ bonus, as to any tax liability to the Commonwealth, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall note the same on the certificate of the administrator, withhold payment, and forthwith send to the claimant by certified mail, return receipt requested a notice of the asserted delinquency, and the amount thereof, and that it is proposed that the same be set off against the veterans’ bonus payment.

If the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet receives no protest in his office within ten (10) working days after recording such notice, he shall conclusively presume that the proposed setoff is just, shall apply the amount thereof in reduction or extinguishment of the payment certified by the administrator, and shall advise the secretary of revenue of the amount set off against the veterans’ bonus, which advice shall be noted by the secretary of revenue on the records of his office as a credit upon the delinquent tax liability.

If the tax setoff does not consume the entire amount of the veterans’ bonus as certified by the administrator, the secretary shall draw a warrant upon the State Treasury for a check in the amount of the remainder, and upon receiving such check from the State Treasurer shall send the same, together with advice of the setoff, by mail, to the payee at the address shown in the certificate of the administrator.

If the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet receives from the claimant a protest of the asserted tax delinquency, within the allowed time, the secretary shall withhold approval for payment, and shall refer the protest to the secretary of revenue for disposition.

If a tax setoff is made, and the claimant shall assert error with regard thereto, the exclusive remedy shall be by seeking refund from the secretary of revenue.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 14; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2); 1974, ch. 315, § 4; 1978, ch. 155, § 41, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 114, § 7, effective July 15, 1980.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The provision of the statute that the Department of Revenue (now Revenue Cabinet) examine the tax account of each bonus claimant for the purpose of determining whether the claimant is delinquent in the payment of any Kentucky taxes is mandatory.

OAG 61-203

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Delinquent taxes, KRS

134.504

,

134.546

to

134.549

.

Publication of delinquent taxpayers, KRS

424.330

.

40.150.
Board of review — Appointment — Only three members to act in any matter — Compensation — Dissolution.

There shall be a board of review consisting of nine (9) persons who are residents and qualified voters of the Commonwealth, appointed by the Governor without limitation as to political affiliation, religion, race, sex, or past or present service in the Armed Forces, except that six (6) members of this board shall be veterans. The name of said board shall be “The Kentucky Veterans’ Bonus Board of Review.” The Governor shall designate a chairman and a secretary from among the membership.

Three (3) members and no more shall constitute a board of review, and shall by concurrence of two (2) members decide any claim which comes before the board in the manner provided in this chapter. The chairman of the board shall designate three (3) members to consider and decide each claim, having due regard for availability for service so that delay may be avoided.

Members of the board shall be compensated twenty-five dollars ($25) per diem, but only for actual time served in considering and deciding claims for veterans’ bonus pursuant to designation by the Governor.

All members of the board shall be reimbursed for necessary travel to and from their places of residence, and in performance of duties pursuant to assignment, at the rate of eight cents (8¢) per mile.

Each claim coming before the board shall promptly be considered and decided by the three (3) members designated for that purpose. In every case the board shall either (a) affirm the decision of the administrator, or (b) determine that a veterans’ bonus should be paid, and to what persons and in what amounts. No written opinions or recitations of reasons for any decision need be made. A statement of the decision made shall be signed by at least two (2) of the three (3) members designated to decide the claim; and upon concurrence of two (2) members a decision shall be final and not subject to reconsideration.

The Governor shall, upon notification by the administrator that the last notice of a disapproval claim has been mailed, notify the chairman of the board of review that it shall complete its work within sixty (60) calendar days from date of notification. On the sixtieth day the Governor shall thereupon declare that the board of review is dissolved and shall so notify the members, and the functions and duties of the board shall be deemed to have been fully performed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 15; 1962, ch. 191, § 2.

40.160.
Claims and payments nonassignable, exempt from taxation and from claims of creditors and process of courts until received.

Claims for payment of veterans’ bonus shall not be assignable before or after approval thereof; and any attempted or purported assignment received by or tendered to any officer of the Commonwealth shall be void, need not be acknowledged or returned, and may be disregarded.

Payments of the veterans’ bonus shall be exempt from all taxation by the Commonwealth, its political subdivisions and taxing districts.

No claim for payment of a veterans’ bonus and no payment made by the Commonwealth under this chapter shall give rise to a cause of action against the Commonwealth or any of its officers, agents, or employees, and no claim for payment shall be subject to attachment, levy, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal or equitable process whatever; but this provision shall not extend exemption from legal process to the proceeds of any veterans’ bonus payment after the same has been received from the Commonwealth.

The Commonwealth does not consent to be sued in any court with regard to any matter connected with or arising out of claims for payment of the veterans’ bonus herein authorized.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 16, effective February 20, 1960.

40.170.
Forfeiture of right to bonus.

Any person convicted of any offense denounced in KRS

40.990

shall forfeit his or her right, if any, to receive any payment authorized by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 20, effective February 20, 1960.

40.180.
Estimates of sums required to finance bonus.

The administrator and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, from time to time, prepare estimates of the sums anticipated to be required for payment of the veterans’ bonus and the times when the same shall be required to be available. Advice of such estimates shall be given by them to the State Property and Buildings Commission with direction that bonds of the Commonwealth be issued and sold in such manner as to provide the required sums at the proper time.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 21, effective February 20, 1960; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2).

40.190.
Issuance of bonds by State Property and Buildings Commission.

For the purpose of providing funds for payment of the veterans’ bonus authorized by this chapter, the State Property and Buildings Commission shall from time to time as funds are anticipated to be required, provide by resolution for the issuance and sale of general obligation bonds of the Commonwealth, for payment of which, both principal and interest when due, the full faith, credit, resources and unlimited taxing power of the Commonwealth shall irrevocably be pledged, together with, additionally, a specific pledge of and first charge upon the proceeds of the retail sales tax required to be levied by the provisions of KRS

40.005

, referred to in KRS

40.020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 22, effective February 20, 1960.

40.200.
Commission’s power to fix details of bonds.

All bonds issued hereunder shall be dated July 1, 1960, and shall mature on or prior to thirty (30) years from such date as the State Property and Buildings Commission may provide in each resolution authorizing the issuance and sale of such bonds. The State Property and Buildings Commission shall in each such resolution determine other details, including whether the bonds shall be of term or serial maturities, and the amount which shall mature on any serial maturity date; denominations; whether the bonds, or any of them, shall be subject to redemption prior to stated maturities and upon what terms; place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be within the Commonwealth or outside thereof; whether the bonds shall have semiannual interest coupons annexed; be registered or registrable as to principal or interest, or both; and any other details not contrary to law or inconsistent with this chapter which in the discretion of the said commission may appear wise and expedient. The commission shall fix and establish the interest rate or rates for each issue of bonds, and interest shall be payable semiannually. Each sale shall be advertised pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 and by at least one (1) publication in a financial newspaper or journal published in the City and State of New York.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 23; 1966, ch. 239, § 2.

40.210.
Tax-exempt character of bonds — Signatures — Temporary and replacement bonds.

The bonds and receipt of interest thereon shall be exempt from all taxation by the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions. The bonds shall be signed in the name of the Commonwealth by the facsimile signatures of the Governor and Treasurer of the Commonwealth, and the great seal of the Commonwealth or a facsimile thereof shall be affixed thereto and attested by the validating manual signature of the Secretary of State and the facsimile signature of the Treasurer shall be printed upon the interest coupons, if any. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature or facsimile signature shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if he had remained in office until delivery. All bonds issued under this chapter shall have and are hereby declared to have all the incidents of negotiable instruments. Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the State Property and Buildings Commission may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without interest coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the same shall have been executed and are available for delivery; and provision may also be made for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or be destroyed or lost. Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the Commonwealth and without any other proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things other than the proceedings, conditions, and things which are specifically required by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 24, effective February 20, 1960.

40.220.
“Veterans’ Bonus Fund”.

The proceeds of all bonds issued and delivered under this chapter shall be deposited from time to time in the State Treasury and shall be segregated in a special fund, hereby created, which shall be designated the “Veterans’ Bonus Fund.” Moneys in said fund from time to time shall be disbursed solely for payment of approved veterans’ bonus claims, and for the expenses incurred in issuing such bonds. Pending disbursement, the same may be invested and reinvested as the State Property and Buildings Commission may from time to time prescribe; and income from the investments shall be credited to such fund.

If there shall be an undisbursed balance in said fund after payment of all approved claims received by the administrator within the time limits established in KRS

40.070

, the same shall be transferred to the general fund of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 25, effective February 20, 1960.

40.230.
Construction of chapter — Administrator’s power to make regulations.

This chapter shall be given a liberal construction in the interpretation thereof. The administrator shall have power to make rules and regulations for implementing this chapter; and when promulgated according to KRS Chapter 13A, the same shall have the force and effect of law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 15, § 26, effective February 20, 1960.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(10/5/90). Pursuant to KRS 7.136(1), KRS Chapter 13A has been substituted for the prior reference to KRS Chapter 13 in this statute. The sections in KRS Chapter 13 were repealed by 1984 Ky. Acts ch. 417, § 36 and KRS Chapter 13A was created in that same chapter of the 1984 Ky. Acts.